Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1580
Act; purpose.

The purpose of the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act is to effectuate the policies set forth in section 81-1579 by providing:

(1) A program of effective regulation of disposal of low-level radioactive waste based on zero-release objectives that will protect the public health and environment with an adequate margin of safety; and

(2) A program to establish procedures for assumption and performance of certain regulatory responsibilities with respect to disposal of low-level radioactive waste.

Nothing in the Low-Level Radioactive Waste Disposal Act shall be intended to establish any other regulatory responsibilities pertaining to radioactive materials except for the licensing and regulation of a facility.

Laws 1986, LB 491, § 3;

Laws 1987, LB 426, § 3.